California statutes. Public Resources Code
(4) The adoption of the guidance document by the Division of Mine Reclamation pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 16) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 349, Sec. 3.   (AB 3257)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.1.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (i) of Section 2770, if the lead agency or the supervisor determines, based upon an annual inspection pursuant to Section 2774, or otherwise confirmed by an inspection of the surface mining operation, that a surface mining operation is not in compliance with this chapter, the lead agency or the supervisor may issue a notice of that violation to the operator by personal service or certified mail. If the lead agency issues the notice, the lead agency shall send a copy of the notice to the supervisor. The notice shall include both of the following:

(A) A description of the violation.

(B) Actions the operator shall take to correct the violation.

(2) (A) If a lead agency or the supervisor determines that the time to correct the noticed violation will exceed 30 days, the lead agency and the operator may enter into a stipulated order to comply, with notice sent to the supervisor. If the supervisor initiated the enforcement action, the supervisor, after consulting with the lead agency, may enter into a stipulated order to comply with the operator. The lead agency may, but need not, join the stipulated order with the supervisor.

(B) A stipulated order to comply shall include a schedule and time for compliance that the lead agency or the supervisor, as applicable, determines is reasonable after taking into account the actions and legal
 processes required to correct the violation.

(3) (A) If the operator does not comply with a notice issued pursuant to paragraph (1) within 30 days of being served the notice or commit to enter into a stipulated order to comply pursuant to paragraph (2) within 30 days of being served the notice, the lead agency or the supervisor may issue an order to comply by personal service or certified mail requiring the operator to comply with this chapter or, if the operator does not have an approved reclamation plan or financial assurances, cease all further surface mining activities. A lead agency shall, at the time of issuing an order to comply, provide a copy to the supervisor.

(B) An order to comply issued pursuant to this paragraph shall take effect 30 days following
 the service of the order to comply unless within those 30 days the operator appeals the order to comply and requests a hearing before the lead agency, if the lead agency issued the order, or the board, if the supervisor issued the order. An order to comply issued pursuant to this paragraph shall specify all of the following:

(i) Which aspects of the surface mining operation are inconsistent with this chapter.

(ii) A time for compliance that the lead agency or supervisor determines is reasonable, taking into account the seriousness of the alleged violation and any good faith efforts to comply with applicable requirements.

(iii) The actions and legal processes required to correct the alleged violation.

(C) An appeal filed pursuant to subparagraph (B) shall be noticed and heard at a public hearing within 45 days of the filing of the appeal or a longer period as may be mutually agreed upon by the operator and the lead agency, if the lead agency issued the order, or the operator and the supervisor, if the supervisor issued the order.

(b) [Reserved]

(c) An operator who violates or fails to comply with an order to comply issued under subdivision (a) after the order’s effective date or who fails to submit a report or pay annual fees to the supervisor or lead agency as required by Section 2207, shall be subject to an order by the lead agency or the supervisor imposing an administrative penalty of not more than five
 thousand dollars ($5,000) per day, assessed from the original date of noncompliance with this chapter, including Section 2207, or from the date of the inspection when the violation was identified, at the discretion of the issuer of the notice of that violation. The penalty may be imposed administratively by the lead agency or the supervisor. In determining the amount of the administrative penalty, the lead agency or the supervisor shall take into consideration the nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the violation or violations, any prior history of violations, the degree of culpability, economic savings, if any, resulting from the violation, and any other matters justice may require. Orders setting administrative penalties shall become effective upon issuance of the assessment and payment shall be made to the lead agency or the supervisor within 30 days, unless the operator petitions
 the legislative body of the lead agency, the board, or the superior court for review as provided in Section 2774.2. An order shall be served by personal service or by certified mail upon the operator. Penalties collected by the supervisor shall not be used for purposes other than to cover the reasonable costs incurred by the department in implementing this chapter or Section 2207.

(d) (1) An operator who violates or fails to comply with an order to comply issued pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) or a stipulated order to comply entered into pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) after the order’s effective date shall be removed from the list published by the Division of Mine Reclamation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2717.

(2) If after a
 public hearing the board or lead agency denies an appeal by the operator pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the operator shall be removed 10 working days following the denial of the appeal from the list published by the Division of Mine Reclamation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2717.

(3) If the operator enters into a stipulated order to comply between the operator and the lead agency, if the lead agency issued the order, or the operator and the supervisor, if the supervisor issued the order, within 10 working days of the denial of the appeal and the stipulated order to comply is consistent with the order to comply upheld by the board or lead agency and includes a stipulated schedule for compliance, the operator shall remain on the list published by the Division of Mine Reclamation pursuant to
 subdivision (b) of Section 2717.

(4) Issuance of a notice pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or an order to comply or stipulated order to comply pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) shall not disqualify an operator from eligibility for placement on the list published by the Division of Mine Reclamation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2717, except in cases where an operator has failed to submit a financial assurance cost estimate to the lead agency or a financial assurance mechanism to the lead agency and supervisor, in accordance with Section 2773.4.

(e) If the lead agency or the supervisor determines that the surface mine is not in compliance with this chapter, so that the surface mine presents an imminent and substantial endangerment to the
 public health or the environment, the lead agency or the Attorney General, on behalf of the supervisor, may seek an order from a court of competent jurisdiction enjoining that operation.

(f) Upon a complaint by the supervisor, the department, or the board, the Attorney General may bring an action to recover administrative penalties under this section, and penalties under Section 2207, in any court of competent jurisdiction in this state against any person violating any provision of this chapter or Section 2207, or any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter or Section 2207. The Attorney General may bring this action on his or her own initiative if, after examining the complaint and the evidence, he or she believes a violation has occurred. The Attorney General may also seek an order from a court of competent jurisdiction compelling the
 operator to comply with this chapter and Section 2207.

(g) (1) The lead agency has primary responsibility for enforcing this chapter and Section 2207. In cases where the board is not the lead agency pursuant to Section 2774.4, enforcement actions may be initiated by the supervisor pursuant to this section only after the violation has come to the attention of the supervisor and either of the following occurs:

(A) The lead agency has been notified by the supervisor in writing of the violation for at least 30 days, and has not taken appropriate enforcement action, which may include failing to issue an order to comply within a reasonable time after issuing a notice of violation.

(B) The supervisor
 determines that there is a violation that amounts to an imminent and substantial endangerment to the public health or safety, or to the environment.

(2) The supervisor shall comply with this section in initiating enforcement actions.

(h) Remedies under this section are in addition to, and do not supersede or limit, any and all other remedies, civil or criminal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 349, Sec. 4.   (AB 3257)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.2.

(a) Within 30 days of the issuance of an order setting administrative penalties under subdivision (c) of Section 2774.1, the operator may petition the legislative body of the lead agency, if the lead agency has issued the order, or the board for orders issued by the supervisor, for review of the order. If the operator does not petition for review within the time limits set by this subdivision, the order setting administrative penalties shall not be subject to review by any court or agency.

(b) The legislative body of the lead agency or the board shall notify the operator by personal service or certified mail whether it will review the order setting administrative penalties. In reviewing
 an order pursuant to this section, the record shall consist of the record before the lead agency or the supervisor and any other relevant evidence which, in the judgment of the legislative body or the board, should be considered to effectuate and implement the policies of this chapter.

(c) The legislative body or the board may affirm, modify, or set aside, in whole or in part, by its own order, an order of the lead agency or the supervisor setting administrative penalties reviewed by the legislative body or the board pursuant to this section.

(d) An order of the legislative body or the board issued under subdivision
 (c) shall become effective upon its issuance unless the operator petitions the superior court for review as provided in subdivision (e). An order shall be served by personal service or by certified mail upon the operator. Payment of an administrative penalty that is specified in an order issued pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be made to the lead agency or the supervisor within 30 days of service of the order. However, the payment shall be held in an interest bearing impound account pending the resolution of a petition for review filed pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) An operator aggrieved by an order of the legislative body or the board issued pursuant to subdivision (c) may obtain review of the order by filing in the superior court a petition for writ of mandate within 30 days following the issuance of the order. An operator aggrieved by an
 order of a lead agency or the supervisor setting administrative penalties pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2774.1, for which the legislative body or board denies review, may obtain review of the order in the superior court by filing in the court a petition for writ of mandate within 30 days following the denial of review. The provisions of Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall govern judicial proceedings pursuant to this subdivision, except that in every case the court shall exercise its independent judgment. If the operator does not petition for a writ of mandate within the time limits set by this subdivision, an order of the board or the legislative body shall not be subject to review by any court or agency.

(f) (1) After the expiration of the time to petition for review pursuant to subdivision (a)
 or (e), the supervisor or the board acting as the lead agency may apply to the small claims court or the superior court, depending on the jurisdictional amount, in the county where the administrative penalty was imposed for a judgment to collect the unpaid administrative penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2774.1. The application shall include all of the following:

(A) The order setting the administrative penalty pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2774.1.

(B) A notice to the operator of the right to petition for review of the order.

(C) Either of the following:

(i) A declaration from the board that no petition was made or that
 the board declined to review the petition.

(ii) A copy of the final order of the board.

(2) An application submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant the issuance of the judgment. The court clerk shall enter the judgment immediately in conformity with the application.

(3) The judgment entered pursuant to this subdivision shall have the same force and effect as, and shall be subject to all the provisions of law relating to, a judgment in a civil action and may be enforced in the same manner as any other judgment of the court. The court shall make enforcement of the judgment a priority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 44.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.2.5.

(a) A lead agency shall submit to the supervisor, in an electronic format determined by the Division of Mine Reclamation, official copies of all of the following:

(1) Approved reclamation plans or plan amendments within 60 days of their approval in accordance with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 2772.1, including reclamation plans approved or upheld by the board or lead agency following an appeal pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2770.

(2) Interim management plans at the time of approval pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 2770.

(3) Financial assurance cost estimates within 30
 days of their approval pursuant to the procedures set forth in Section 2773.4, including financial assurance cost estimates approved or upheld by the board or lead agency following an appeal pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2770.

(4) Financial assurance mechanisms at the time of approval pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 2773.4.

(5) Notices of violation at the time of issuance pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2774.1.

(6) Orders to comply at the time of issuance pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2774.1.

(7) Notices of violations at the time of issuance pursuant to the surface mining ordinances of the lead agency.

(8) Stipulated orders to comply at the time of issuance pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 2774.1.

(9) Orders imposing an administrative penalty at the time of issuance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2774.1.

(10) Administrative decisions at the time of issuance following an appeal of an order to comply issued pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2774.1 or decisions following an appeal of an order imposing an administrative penalty at the time of issuance pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2774.1.

(11) Notices to an operator of a violation or failure to comply with an order to comply or stipulated order to comply at the time of issuance pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2774.1.

(12) Notices of completion of inspection, including the completed inspection form, at the time of issuance pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2774.

(13) Permits at the time of approval to conduct surface mining operations pursuant to Section 2770.

(14) Vested rights determinations pursuant to Section 2776.

(b) No later than January 1, 2022, the Division of Mine Reclamation shall post on its Internet Web site the documents and information listed in subdivision (a) in a database and in a geographic information system interface.

(c) If a member of the public seeks access to the information that lead agencies are required to submit to the supervisor pursuant to subdivision (a) and the lead
 agency has failed to submit the requested documents or information, the Division of Mine Reclamation shall make this disclosure: “This data has not been provided by the lead agency responsible for regulating this mine.”

(d) The Division of Mine Reclamation may promulgate regulations implementing this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 17.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.3.

The board shall review lead agency ordinances which establish permit and reclamation procedures to determine whether each ordinance is in accordance with state policy, and shall certify the ordinance as being in accordance with state policy if it adequately meets, or imposes requirements more stringent than, the California surface mining and reclamation policies and procedures established by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 975, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.4.

(a) The board shall exercise some or all of a lead agency’s powers under this chapter pursuant to subdivision (c), except for permitting authority and vested rights determinations, if the board finds that a lead agency has done any of the following:

(1) Approved reclamation plans or financial assurance mechanisms that are not consistent with this chapter.

(2) Failed to inspect or cause the inspection of surface mining operations as required by this chapter.

(3) Failed to seek forfeiture of financial assurances and to carry out reclamation of surface mining operations
 as required by this chapter.

(4) Failed to take appropriate enforcement actions as required by this chapter.

(5) Intentionally misrepresented the results of inspections required under this chapter.

(6) Failed to submit information to the Division of Mine Reclamation as required by this chapter.

(b) The board shall conduct a public hearing no sooner than three years after the board has taken action pursuant to subdivision (a) to determine if a lead agency has corrected its deficiencies in implementing and enforcing this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter. If the board finds the lead agency has corrected some or
 all of its deficiencies in implementing and enforcing this chapter, the board shall restore to the lead agency some or all of the powers assumed by the board pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) (1) Before taking any action pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall first notify the lead agency of the identified deficiencies and allow the lead agency 45 days to provide a response to the board on the identified deficiencies. The board may review the lead agency’s response at a regularly scheduled meeting.

(2) (A) If the board is not satisfied with the lead agency’s response, the board shall hold a public hearing within the lead agency’s area of jurisdiction, upon a 45-day written notice given to the public in at least one newspaper of general
 circulation within the city or county and directly mailed to the lead agency and to all operators within the lead agency’s jurisdiction who have submitted reports as required by Section 2207.

(B) At the hearing, the board shall determine if the lead agency has engaged in the conduct described in subdivision (a). If the board finds that the lead agency has engaged in conduct described in subdivision (a), the board shall do either of the following:

(i) Require the lead agency to develop a remedial plan to correct the noted deficiencies. The remedial plan shall describe specific objectives and corresponding processes designed to address, at a minimum, the noted deficiencies and a time that the remedial plan will be fully implemented. The board shall set a hearing to review the
 completion of the remedial plan consistent with paragraph (2) and subdivisions (d) and (e).

(ii) Take immediate action pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) Affected operators and interested persons have the right at the public hearing to present oral and written evidence on the matter being considered. At the public hearing, the board may place reasonable limits on the right of affected operators and interested persons to question and solicit testimony.

(e) (1) If the board decides to take action pursuant to subdivision (a) and exercise some or all of a lead agency’s powers under this chapter, except for permitting authority and vested rights determinations, the board, based on the record of the public hearing,
 shall adopt written findings that explain all of the following:

(A) The action to be taken by the board.

(B) Why the board decided to take the action.

(C) Why the action is authorized by and meets the requirements of subdivision (a).

(2) In addition, the board’s findings shall address the significant issues raised, or written evidence presented, by affected operators, interested persons, the lead agency, or the Division of Mine Reclamation. The transcript of testimony and exhibits, together with all papers and requests filed in the proceedings, shall constitute the exclusive record for decision by the board.

(f) If the board finds at the hearing held pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) that the lead agency has not completed the remedial plan prepared pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) to the board’s satisfaction, the board shall follow the procedures set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) and subdivisions (d) and (e). If the board finds at the hearing held pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) that the lead agency has completed the remedial plan prepared pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) to the board’s satisfaction, the board shall conclude the action it has taken pursuant to this section.

(g) The lead agency, any affected operator, or any interested person who has presented oral or written evidence at the public hearing
 before the board pursuant to subdivision (d) may obtain review of the board’s action taken pursuant to subdivision (a) by filing in the superior court a petition for writ of mandate within 30 days following the issuance of the board’s decision. Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure governs judicial proceedings pursuant to this subdivision, except that in every case the court shall exercise its independent judgment. If a petition for a writ of mandate is not filed within the time limits set by this subdivision, the board’s action under subdivision (a) shall not be subject to review by any court or agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 45.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.5.

(a) If, upon review of an ordinance, the board finds that it is not in accordance with state policy, the board shall communicate the ordinance’s deficiencies in writing to the lead agency. Upon receipt of the written communication, the lead agency shall have 90 days to submit a revised ordinance to the board for certification as being in accordance with state policy. The board shall review the lead agency’s revised ordinance for certification within 60 days of its receipt. If the lead agency does not submit a revised ordinance within 90 days, the board shall assume full authority for reviewing and approving reclamation plans submitted to the lead agency until the time the lead agency’s ordinances are revised in accordance with state policy.

(b) If, upon review of a lead agency’s revised ordinance, the board finds the ordinance is still not in accordance with state policy, the board shall again communicate the ordinance’s deficiencies in writing to the lead agency. The lead agency shall have a second 90-day period in which to revise the ordinance and submit it to the board for review. If the board again finds that the revised ordinance is not in accordance with state policy or if no revision is submitted, the board shall assume full authority for reviewing and approving reclamation plans submitted to the lead agency until the time the lead agency’s ordinances are revised in accordance with state policy.

(c) In any jurisdiction in which the lead agency does not have a certified ordinance, no person shall initiate a surface mining operation unless a reclamation plan has been submitted to, and approved by, the board. Any reclamation plan, approved by a lead agency under the lead agency’s ordinance which was not in accordance with state policy at the time of approval, shall be subject to amendment by the board or under the ordinance certified by the board as being in accordance with state policy.

(d) Reclamation plans approved by the board pursuant to this section shall not be subject to modification by the lead agency at a future date but may be amended by the board. Reclamation plans approved by the board shall be remanded to the lead agency upon certification of the lead agency’s ordinance, and the lead agency shall approve the reclamation plan as approved by the board, except that a subsequent amendment as may be agreed upon between the operator and the lead agency may be made according to this chapter. No additional public hearing shall be required prior to the lead agency’s approval. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing the board to issue a permit for the conduct of mining operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 975, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2775.

(a) An applicant whose request for a permit to conduct surface mining operations in an area of statewide or regional significance has been denied by a lead agency, or any person who is aggrieved by the granting of a permit to conduct surface mining operations in an area of statewide or regional significance, may, within 15 days of exhausting his rights to appeal in accordance with the procedures of the lead agency, appeal to the board.

(b) The board may, by regulation, establish procedures for declining to hear appeals that it determines raise no substantial issues.

(c) Appeals that the board does not decline to hear shall be scheduled and heard at a public hearing held within the jurisdiction of the lead agency which processed the original application within 30 days of the filing of the appeal, or such longer period as may be mutually agreed upon by the board and the person filing the appeal. In any such action, the board shall not exercise its independent judgment on the evidence but shall only determine whether the decision of the lead agency is supported by substantial evidence in the light of the whole record. If the board determines the decision of the lead agency is not supported by substantial evidence in the light of the whole record it shall remand the appeal to the lead agency and the lead agency shall schedule a public hearing to reconsider its action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2776.

(a) No person who has obtained a vested right to conduct surface mining operations prior to January 1, 1976, shall be required to secure a permit pursuant to this chapter as long as the vested right continues and as long as no substantial changes are made in the operation except in accordance with this chapter. A person shall be deemed to have vested rights if, prior to January 1, 1976, the person has, in good faith and in reliance upon a permit or other authorization, if the permit or other authorization was required, diligently commenced surface mining operations and incurred substantial liabilities for work and materials necessary for the surface mining operations. Expenses incurred in obtaining the enactment of an ordinance in relation to a particular operation or the issuance of a permit shall not be deemed liabilities for work or materials.

(b) The reclamation plan required to be filed under subdivision (b) of Section 2770, shall apply to operations conducted after January 1, 1976, or to be conducted.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the filing of a reclamation plan for, or the reclamation of, mined lands on which surface mining operations were conducted prior to January 1, 1976.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 560.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2777.

Amendments to an approved reclamation plan may be submitted detailing proposed changes from the original plan. Substantial deviations from the original plan shall not be undertaken until such amendment has been filed with, and approved by, the lead agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2777.3.

(a) The construction and operation of a renewable energy generation facility on disturbed mined lands, including all foundations and other installations, facilities, buildings, accessory structures, and other improvements to the land that are related to the generation of energy, shall be considered an interim use for the purposes of this chapter and shall not require an amendment to an approved reclamation plan if all of the following criteria are met:

(1) The renewable energy generation facility will not adversely affect the completion of reclamation in accordance with the surface mining operation’s approved reclamation plan.

(2) The permit conditions of the renewable energy generation facility address and eliminate any potentially adverse impacts on the surface mining operation.

(3) The operating permit for the renewable energy generation facility includes both of the following:

(A) An approved closure and decommissioning plan that will not affect the manner in which reclamation will be achieved pursuant to this chapter.

(B) A separate financial assurance mechanism that the lead agency determines to be sufficient to perform the removal of the renewable energy generation facility.

(4) The closure and decommissioning of the renewable energy generation facility will
 occur prior to the later of the following:

(A) The expiration of the use permit for the surface mining operation.

(B) The completion of reclamation in accordance with the surface mining operation’s approved reclamation plan.

(5) All required permits for the construction and related land improvements have been approved by a public agency in accordance with the applicable provisions of state law and locally adopted plans and ordinances, including, but not limited to, the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)).

(b) (1) Prior to approving an operating permit for a renewable energy generation
 facility subject to this section, the lead agency shall submit the operating permit application with all the associated maps and plans to the supervisor for review.

(2) The supervisor shall have 30 days from the receipt of the application with associated documents to prepare written comments if the supervisor chooses.

(3) The supervisor may provide comments relating to whether the renewable energy generation facility meets the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(4) The lead agency shall prepare a written response to the supervisor’s comments and submit its response to the supervisor at least 30 days prior to the approval of the operating permit for the renewable energy generation
 facility.

(c) Copies of all approved permits and associated documents shall be submitted to the lead agency and the supervisor as an addendum to the approved reclamation plan no less than 30 days prior to the commencement of land improvements associated with the renewable energy generation facility.

(d) For purposes of this section, “renewable energy generation facility” means a solar photovoltaic, solar thermal under 50 megawatts, or wind energy generation facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 46.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2777.5.

(a) An operator who has failed to properly report a mine’s mineral production or mine status in any previous year, pursuant to the annual reporting requirement in Section 2207, prior to January 1, 2012, may attach corrected annual reports to the 2012 annual report so long as the corrected annual reports are submitted on or before July 1, 2013, and if the lead agency confirms in writing to the department all of the following:

(1) The operator has provided written notification to the lead agency and the supervisor of their intention to continue surface mining operations.

(2) The operator has an existing, valid permit or a
 vested right to conduct surface mining operations pursuant to Section 2776.

(3) (A) The operator’s reclamation plan has been approved and is in compliance with this chapter, the surface mining operation is in compliance with the approved reclamation plan or applicable compliance order issued pursuant to this chapter, the surface mining operation has an approved financial assurance in place that the lead agency determines is adequate for reclamation pursuant to the approved reclamation plan, and the surface mining operation has been inspected by the lead agency as provided by Section 2774.

(B) The Division of Mine Reclamation may enter any mine site for which an operator has requested a correction of mine status or a return to idle status pursuant to this
 section in order to conduct an inspection.

(4) The operator has demonstrated that there are commercially useful mineral reserves remaining at the surface mining operation.

(5) Unpaid fees for years during which the operation’s status was not properly reported have been paid to the department.

(6) The operator provides evidence to support any modified production reported on corrected annual reports.

(b) A mining operation that became idle, as defined in Section 2727.1, that failed to prepare and have approved an interim management plan and was thus considered abandoned pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (h) of Section 2770 prior to January 1, 2013, may, without
 prejudice, be returned to idle status at the request of the operator if an interim management plan is approved by July 1, 2013, and upon lead agency verification of compliance with subdivision (a).

(c) The mine operator shall be responsible for the reasonable
 costs of an inspection conducted by the Division of Mine Reclamation pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 47.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2778.

(a) Reclamation plans, reports, applications, and other documents submitted pursuant to this chapter are public records, unless it can be demonstrated to the satisfaction of the lead agency that the release of that information, or part thereof, would reveal production, reserves, or rate of depletion entitled to protection as proprietary information. The lead agency shall identify such proprietary information as a separate part of the application. Proprietary information shall be made available only to the supervisor and to persons authorized in writing by the operator and by the owner.

(b) A copy of all reclamation plans, reports, applications, and other
 documents submitted pursuant to this chapter shall be furnished to the supervisor by lead agencies on request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 48.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2779.

Whenever one operator succeeds to the interest of another in any incompleted surface mining operation by sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance, exchange, or other means, the successor shall be bound by the provisions of the approved reclamation plan and the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Areas of Statewide or Regional Significance [2790. - 2793.]

2790.

After receipt of mineral information from the State Geologist pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2761, the board may, by regulation adopted after a public hearing, designate specific geographic areas of the state as areas of statewide or regional significance and specify the boundaries of the geographic areas. The designation shall be included as a part of the state policy and shall indicate the reason for which the particular area designated is of significance to the state or region, the adverse effects that might result from premature development of incompatible land uses, the advantages that might be achieved from extraction of the minerals of the area, and the specific goals and policies to protect against the premature incompatible development of the
 area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 472, Sec. 5.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2791.

The board shall seek the recommendations of concerned federal, state, and local agencies, educational institutions, civic and public interest organizations, and private organizations and individuals in the identification of areas of statewide and regional significance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2792.

Neither the designation of an area of regional or statewide significance nor the adoption of any regulations for such an area shall in any way limit or modify the rights of any person to complete any development that has been authorized pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 11000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code, pursuant to the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code), or by a building permit or other authorization to commence development, upon which such person relies and has changed his position to his substantial detriment, and, which permit or authorization was issued prior to the designation of such area pursuant to Section 2790. If a developer has by his actions taken in reliance upon prior regulations obtained vested or other legal rights that in law would have prevented a local public agency from changing such regulations in a way adverse to his interests, nothing in this chapter authorizes any governmental agency to abridge those rights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------

2793.

The board may, by regulation adopted after a public hearing, terminate, partially or wholly, the designation of any area of statewide or regional significance on a finding that the direct involvement of the board is no longer required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1131.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Fiscal Provisions [2795. - 2796.5.]

2795.
